cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/lv_rules
// translation rules for Latvian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Default rules for o with succeeding consonants 
.L01	f h w x    // o is pronounced as o with international consonants after o
.L02	č ķ ļ ņ ž  // o is pronounced as uo with Latvian soft consonants after o

.L03	iem am os s a  u ā i   	// suffixes for masculine words finishing with s
.L04    ām ās as ai u ā a  	// suffixes for feminine words finishing with a
.L05 	iem is im os i ī    	// suffixes for masculine words finishing with is (wthout consonant alteration)
.L06	a ā 			
.L07	ēm ēs es ei e i ē  u	// suffixes for feminine words finishing with e
.L08    amies amas amās ama ami  ams   
.L09    s š
.L10    t d j                    //     
.L11    iem os i u               // suffixes for plural masculine words finishing with i
.L12	iem am os s ā    	// suffixes for masculine words finishing with s (except a, i, u) 
.L13	e ē
     

// quiet vowels not only a but aeiou

.group a
        a        a
        ai       ai
        au       au
        ap	 ap	// prefix

.group ā
        ā        a:

.group b
        b        b

.group c
         c              ts
         ch             tS	// Appears mostly in English, not in old latvian writing where should be x
     er) ch     (ercogs tsh
 fridri) ch     (s      tsh
        

.group č
        č        tS

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        e
        ei       ei

.group ē
        ē        e:

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
     _) g (_     ga
  DD__) g (_     gada


.group ģ
        ģ        J

.group h
        h        h


.group i
        i        i
        ie       ie
        iu       iu

.group ī
        ī        i:

.group j
        j        j
     _) jā	 ja: 	// prefix
     _) jāno	 ja:nuo // prefix 
.group k
        k        k

.group ķ
        ķ        c

.group l
        l        l
    	ll	ll:	// espeak says doubled ll shorter that doubled ļļ

.group ļ
        ļ        l^
     k) ļ (u     lj     // [kl^u] sounds bad in eSpeak
     k) ļ (u     lj

.group m
        m        m
    	mm	mm:	
        _)      maz     maz       

.group n
        n        n
        n (g     N	// now sounds acceptable
        n (k     N	
    	nn	nn:	// espeak says doubled nn shorter that doubled ņņ

.group ņ
        ņ        n^

.group o
// default policy rules
                o               uo      // words with Latvian roots are more common
                o       (T++++  o       // if word has $alt in lv_list, speak with o
        k)      o       (_      uo      // kuo at the end of word
                o       (_      o:      // o: at the end of word
                o       (L01	o       // usually o before international consonants 
                o       (L02	uo      // usually uo before soft (Latvian) consonants 
        
        č)	o	        uo	// usually uo after soft consonants  
        ķ)	o	        uo            
        ļ)	o	        uo
        ņ)	o	        uo
        ž)	o	        uo

        f)	o	        o       // usually o after international consonants
        h)	o	        o
        w)	o	        o
        x)	o	        o


                                        // standard prefixes
       _n)	o       (+	uo 


       _kil)    o               o	// international prefixes
       _mikr)   o       (+      o       // otherwise conflicts with ..kroko(t/d)..
       _micr)   o               o
       _nan)    o               o
       _pik)    o               o
       _hekt)   o               o 
       _m)      ono             ono
       _stere)  o               o:
    
 			                // suffixes
        āt)	o       (_	uo
        b)      o       (_      uo	
        br)     o       (_      uo
        c)      o       (_      uo  
        d)      o       (_      uo 	
        dr)     o       (_      uo
        ēl)	o       (_	uo
        ēt)	o       (_	uo
        g)      o       (_      uo   
        ģ)      o       (_      uo  
        j)      o       (_      uo 
        l)      o       (_      uo    
        m)	o       (_	uo
        n)	o       (_	uo
        uš)	o       (_	uo
                o       (s_     uo
        oš)	o       (_	uo 
	        o       (šs_	uo 
                o       (ties_+ uo
                o       (t_++   uo 
                oto     (_      uotuo  
        p)      o       (_      uo     
        r)	o       (_	uo
        s)	o       (_	uo        
        š)	o       (_	uo
        v)	o       (_	uo
        t)	o       (_	uo	
        z)	o       (_	uo   


// exception list by root parts of the words 			                
//a                        
        abs)	o       (l	o	
        ab)	o       (n	o
        ab) 	o       (r	o
        ad)	o       (p	o
        ad)     o       (k      o
        aer)	o	        o:
        aer)	o       (fo	o
        aer)	o       (d	o
        aer)	o       (so	o
        aeros)  o       (l	o:
        afr)    o               o
        ag)	o       (n	o:
        ag)	o       (nā	o
        agl)	o       (nL04_  uo      // ..aglona
        agn)	o	        o	
        agr)	o	        o
        ak)	o       (r	o
        akr)    o               o	
        al)	o       (g	o:
        aleg)   o       (r      o:
        alk)	o	        o
       _al)	o       (t	o
        alv)	o 	        uo
        am)     o       (n      o
        amin)   o               o
        am)	o       (r	o
        anekd)  o               o:
        an)     o       (d      o:
        an)	o       (l	o
        an)	o       (m	o
        an)	o       (n	o
        an)     o       (t      o       
        ant)	o       (l	o  
        ant)	o       (n	o
       _ant)	o       (ņinL04_ o      // Antoņina
        apr)	o       (k	uo
        arist)  o               o        
        arn)	o	        o
        audi)   o               o:	
        aug)	o       (n	uo
       _aut)	o	        o
        aut)	o	(m      o
        aut) 	o       (ri	o  
        aut)    ostop           o:stop
        antip)  o	        o
        ant)    o       (nL03_	o:      // Antons
        antr)	opo	        opo
        a)      o       (r      o
        ap)     o       (l      o
        apr)	o       (cL07_	uo	// aproce 
       _ask)    o       (ldL03_ o       // Askolds
        ap)     o       (k      o
        ap)     o       (strof  o
        astr)	o       (n	o 
        astr)	ono	        ono:
        at)	o       (m	o:
        atm)	o       (s	o
        av)     o               uo
        avi)	o 	        o:
        āb)     o       (l      uo
       _ād)     o       (lfL03  o       // Ādolfs

//b  
        bar)    o       (kl     uo
        bar)    o       (kļ     uo
       _bar)    o       (k      o
       _bar)    o       (m      o
       _bar)    o       (nA     o
       _bar)    o       (nL03_  o:      // barons
        beg)	o       (ni	o:
        bet) 	        o	o
        bi)	        o	o
        bir)	        o	o
        biz)    o       (L10+   uo      
        blāv)   o               uo
        bl)	o       (k	o
        bl)	o       (ķ	o
        bl)     o       (n      o
       _blont)  o       (s_     uo      // blontos
        b)      o       (b      o
        b)      o       (jL04_  o       // ..boja
        b)	o       (mb     o
       _b)      o       (la_    uo
       _b)      o       (lām_   uo
        b)      o       (līt    uo
        b)      o       (līj    uo
       _b)      o       (līdL03_ o      // bolīds
        b)      o       (līdL08_ uo     // bolīd..
        b)      o       (līs    uo      // bolīs..
        b)      o       (līš    uo      // bolīš..
        b)      o       (loš    uo      // bološ..
       _b)      o       (lu     uo
        b)	o       (l	o:
        b)	o       (ļš	o	// from Russian
        b)      o       (ks     o
        b)      o       (nē     o
        b)      o       (rs     o:
        b)	o       (rak	o
        b)	o       (rat	o
        b)      o       (rt     o
        b)      o       (tān    o
       _b)      o       (tL07_  o       // bote
       _b)      o       (zL07_+ uo      // boze
       _b)      o       (za_    uo      // boza
        brav)	o	        o
        brīv)   o               uo
       _br)     o       (kātL03_ o      // brokāts
        br)	o       (m	o
        br)	o       (š	o	
        br)	o       (n	o

//c
        cēl)	o	        uo
        ci)	o       (n	o
        cikl)   o               o:
        ciet)	o       (k	uo
        cit)    o               o
        c)      o       (ll     o

//d
        daig)	o       (n	uo
        dail)	o       (n	uo
        dalt)   o       (n      o:
       _dat)    o       (s_     uo 
        dat)	o	        o
        dil)    o       (n      uo
        dil)    o       (ņ      uo
        dinam)  o	        o:	
        dem)	o	        o
        den)	o       	o
        dek)	o       	o
        dep)	o       	o       //depo.. (zīts/portē/nē/utt.)
        desp)   o               o
        disl)	o       	o
        disp)	o	        o
        d)      o       (c      o
        d)      o       (dek    o
       _d)      o       (gL03_  o       // dogs
        d)      o       (gm     o
       _d)	o       (kL03_	o       // doks
        d)	o       (ku	o
        d)	o       (min	o
        d)      o       (mnL04_ o       // domna
        d)	o       (nk	o	  
        d)	o       (nn	o
        d)      ono             ono:   
        d)      o       (p      o
        d)      o       (ri     o 
        d)      o       (tāc    o
        d)      o       (tē     o	    
        d)	ostoj	        ostoj   // from Russian
       _d)      o       (nL04_++ uo     // dona
       _d)      o       (zL04_++ o:     // doza
        d)      o       (zL07_++ uo     // ..doze
        d)      o       (z      o
        dr)	o       (mL03	o:      // ..droms
        dž)     o       (ul     o

//e
        e)	o       	o
        egl)	o       (n	uo
        eg)	o       (n	o:
        eir)	o	        o:
       _ek)     o               o: 
        ek)	ono	        ono:
        eks)    o               o
        ekvin)  o               o     
        ekspl)  o               o
        elektr) o	        o:
        em)     o       (ci     o:
        energ)  o               o:
        ent)	o       	o
        enz)	o	        o
        epiz)   o       (d      o:
        ep)     o       (l      o      
        ep)     o       (sL03_  o       // ..eposs
        epr)	o	        o
        ept)    o       (@      o
        er)     o       (g      o
        etn)    o               o
        ev)     o       (l      o
       _ez)     o       (t      o
